New York, session 2025-2026, A5820.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 6 of section 2590-c of the 2 education law, as amended by chapter 364 of the laws of 2022, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 (a) In addition to the conditions enumerated in the public officers 5 law creating a vacancy[,]: 6 (1) a member of a community district education council who refuses or 7 neglects to attend three meetings of such council of which [he or she 8 is] they are duly notified, without rendering in writing a good and 9 valid excuse therefore vacates [his or her] their office by refusal to 10 serve. Each absence and any written excuse rendered shall be included 11 within the official written minutes of such meeting. After the third 12 unexcused absence the community council shall declare a vacancy to the 13 chancellor. 14 (2) a member of a community district education council appointed by a 15 borough president who engages in criminal wrongdoing or misconduct, as 16 such term is defined by the chancellor, may be removed from such 17 appointment by the appointing borough president upon such time the 18 community council shall declare a vacancy to the chancellor. 19 § 2. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 8 of section 2590-c of the education 20 law, as added by chapter 739 of the laws of 1988, is amended to read as 21 follows: 22 (a) In addition to the conditions enumerated in the public officers 23 law creating a vacancy[,]: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09853-01-5 A. 5820 2 1 (1) a member of a community board who refuses or neglects to attend 2 three meetings of [his] their board of which [he is] they are duly noti- 3 fied, without rendering in writing a good and valid excuse therefor 4 vacates [his] their office by refusal to serve. Each absence and any 5 written excuse rendered shall be included within the official written 6 minutes of such meeting. After the third unexcused absence the board 7 shall declare a vacancy and certify the existence of the vacancy to the 8 chancellor. 9 (2) a member of a community district education council appointed by a 10 borough president who engages in criminal wrongdoing or misconduct, as 11 such term is defined by the chancellor, may be removed from such 12 appointment by the appointing borough president upon such time the board 13 shall declare a vacancy and certify the existence of the vacancy to the 14 chancellor. 15 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided that the amend- 16 ments to section 2590-c of the education law made by section one of this 17 act shall be subject to the expiration and reversion of such section 18 when upon such date the provisions of section two of this act shall take 19 effect.